de: Lösungsformat für mechanische Puzzles: Mobile App; Keine Lösung enthalten; Anleitung auf der Verpackung; Gedrucktes Booklet; QR-Code / Webseite; Einseitiges Beiblatt; Video-Tutorial; Sonstiges
tr: Mekanik bulmaca çözüm formatı: Mobil uygulama; Çözüm sunulmamış; Kutu üzerinde talimatlar; Basılı kitapçık; QR kodu / web sayfası; Tek sayfa eklenti; Eğitim videosu; Diğer
ko: 기계식 퍼즐 해결 형태: 모바일 앱; 해답 미제공; 상자 외부 지침; 인쇄된 소책자; QR 코드/웹페이지; 단일 시트 인서트; 비디오 튜토리얼; 기타
zh-CN: 机械解谜玩具解答形式: 移动应用; 不提供解法; 包装盒上的说明; 纸质手册; 二维码/网页; 单页说明书; 视频教程; 其他
it: Formato della soluzione del puzzle meccanico: App mobile; Nessuna soluzione fornita; Istruzioni sulla scatola; Libretto stampato; Codice QR / pagina web; Foglio illustrativo singolo; Video tutorial; Altro
nl: Mechanische puzzel oplossingsformaat: Mobiele app; Geen oplossing meegeleverd; Instructies op de doos; Gedrukt boekje; QR-code / webpagina; Enkelvels bijsluiter; Video-tutorial; Overige
da: Format til løsning af mekaniske puslespil: Mobilapp; Ingen løsning angivet; Vejledning på æsken; Trykt hæfte; QR-kode / webside; Enkeltsides indlæg; Videovejledning; Andet
nb: Format for løsning av mekanisk puslespill: Mobilapp; Ingen løsning inkludert; Instruksjoner på boksen; Trykt hefte; QR-kode / nettside; Enkeltsidig innlegg; Videoopplæring; Annet
fi: Mekaanisen pulmapelin ratkaisumuoto: Mobiilisovellus; Ei ratkaisua mukana; Ohjeet laatikossa; Painettu vihkonen; QR-koodi / verkkosivu; Yksittäinen ohjelehtinen; Videotutoriaali; Muu
zh-TW: 機械式智力玩具解答格式: 行動應用程式; 未提供解答; 外盒說明; 紙本手冊; QR 碼/網頁; 單張說明書; 教學影片; 其他
pl: Format rozwiązania łamigłówki mechanicznej: Aplikacja mobilna; Brak rozwiązania; Instrukcje na pudełku; Wydrukowana książeczka; Kod QR / strona internetowa; Pojedyncza kartka z instrukcją; Tutorial wideo; Inne
ru: Формат решения механической головоломки: Мобильное приложение; Без решения; Инструкция на коробке; Буклет; QR-код / веб-страница; Вкладыш; Видеоурок; Другое
es: Formato de solución de rompecabezas mecánicos: App móvil; Sin solución proporcionada; Instrucciones en la caja; Folleto impreso; Código QR / página web; Inserto de una sola hoja; Video tutorial; Otro
lt-LT: Mechaninio galvosūkio sprendimo formatas: Mobilioji programa; Sprendimas nepateiktas; Instrukcijos ant dėžutės; Atspausdinta brošiūra; QR kodas / interneto puslapis; Vieno lapo įdėklas; Vaizdo mokomoji medžiaga; Kita
ro-RO: Formatul soluției puzzle-ului mecanic: Aplicație pentru mobil; Nicio soluție oferită; Instrucțiuni pe cutie; Broșură tipărită; Cod QR / pagină web; Pliant cu o singură filă; Tutorial video; Altele
hr-HR: Format rješenja mehaničke zagonetke: Mobilna aplikacija; Rješenje nije priloženo; Upute na kutiji; Tiskana knjižica; QR kod / web-stranica; Umetak na jednom listu; Videoobuka; Ostalo
sv: Lösningsformat för mekaniskt pussel: Mobilapp; Ingen lösning tillhandahålls; Instruktioner på lådan; Tryckt häfte; QR-kod/webbsida; Ettbladig insats; Videohandledning; Annat
ja: 機械パズルの解答形式: モバイルアプリ; 解答なし; 箱に記載された説明; 印刷された小冊子; QRコード / ウェブページ; 1枚の挿入シート; 動画チュートリアル; その他
el: Μορφή λύσης μηχανικού παζλ: Εφαρμογή για κινητά; Δεν παρέχεται λύση; Οδηγίες στο κουτί; Έντυπο φυλλάδιο; Κώδικας QR / ιστοσελίδα; Μονόφυλλο ένθετο; Οδηγός εκμάθησης σε βίντεο; Άλλο
hu: Mechanikus fejtörő megoldásainak formátuma: Mobilalkalmazás; Nincs mellékelt megoldás; Dobozon lévő utasítások; Nyomtatott füzet; QR-kód / weboldal; Egylapos betét; Videós útmutató; Egyéb
sl-SI: Format rešitve mehanske sestavljanke: Mobilna aplikacija; Rešitev ni priložena; Navodila na škatli; Natisnjena knjižica; QR koda / spletna stran; Enostranski vložek; Video vadnica; Drugo
cs: Formát řešení mechanické hádanky: Mobilní aplikace; Řešení není poskytnuto; Pokyny na krabici; Tištěná brožura; QR kód / webová stránka; Leták z jednoho listu; Video tutoriál; Jiné
bg-BG: Формат за решение на механичен пъзел: Мобилно приложение; Не е предоставено решение; Инструкции на кутията; Отпечатана книжка; QR код / уеб страница; Листовка; Видео обучение; Друго
vi: Định dạng giải câu đố cơ khí: Ứng dụng di động; Không kèm đáp án; Hướng dẫn trên hộp; Sách hướng dẫn in; Mã QR / trang web; Tờ hướng dẫn rời; Video hướng dẫn; Khác
pt-BR: Quebra-cabeça mecânico formato da solução: App móvel; Nenhuma solução fornecida; Instruções na caixa; Folheto impresso; Código QR / página da web; Encarte de folha única; Tutorial em vídeo; Outro
pt-PT: Formato da solução de um puzzle mecânico: App para dispositivos móveis; Nenhuma solução fornecida; Instruções na caixa; Folheto impresso; Código QR/página web; Folheto de folha única; Tutorial em vídeo; Outro
th: รูปแบบการแก้ปริศนาเชิงกล: แอปบนมือถือ; ไม่มีโซลูชันให้; คำแนะนำบนกล่อง; คู่มือแบบพิมพ์; คิวอาร์โค้ด / หน้าเว็บ; เอกสารแทรกแผ่นเดียว; วิดีโอแนะนำ; อื่นๆ
fr: Format de solution du casse-tête mécanique: Appli mobile; Aucune solution fournie; Instructions sur la boîte; Livret imprimé; Code QR / page web; Encart simple; Tutoriel vidéo; Autre
sk-SK: Formát riešenia mechanického hlavolamu: Mobilná aplikácia; Bez riešenia; Pokyny na krabici; Tlačená brožúra; QR kód / webová stránka; Príbalový leták; Video tutoriál; Iné
en: Mechanical puzzle solution format: Mobile app; No solution provided; On-box instructions; Printed booklet; QR code / web page; Single-sheet insert; Video tutorial; Other